Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-8510
Behavioral health screenings; legislative
intent; optional screening.

It is the intent of the Legislature that behavioral health
screenings be offered by physicians at the time of childhood physicals. The
physician shall explain that such screening is optional. The results of behavioral
health screenings and any related documents shall not be included in the child's
school record and shall not be provided to the child's school or to any other
person or entity without the express consent of the child's parent or legal
guardian.

Laws 2013, LB556, § 2.
September 6, 2013